New York, session 2025-2026, S10314.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Housing Mobility Mortgage Study Act". 3 § 2. Study on housing mobility mortgage programs. 1. The commissioner 4 of housing and community renewal, in consultation with the state of New 5 York mortgage agency (SONYMA), shall conduct a study on the feasibility 6 and potential impacts of establishing a state-backed housing mobility 7 mortgage program within the state of New York. 8 2. Such study shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of: 9 (a) the administrative and operational feasibility of establishing a 10 housing mobility mortgage program through SONYMA; 11 (b) the potential effects of such a program on housing inventory, 12 housing mobility, residential real estate markets, and housing afforda- 13 bility within the state; 14 (c) potential mortgage structures or financing models that could 15 facilitate housing mobility for homeowners relocating within the state; 16 (d) the feasibility of offering below-market mortgage financing 17 through SONYMA for homeowners purchasing a new primary residence follow- 18 ing the sale of a prior primary residence; 19 (e) the potential use of housing bonds, mortgage revenue bonds, 20 revolving loan funds, or other financing mechanisms to support such a 21 program; 22 (f) the fiscal and budgetary impacts of establishing such a program, 23 including potential impacts on taxpayers, state finances, and existing 24 housing finance programs; 25 (g) the potential effects on the financial stability, bonding capaci- 26 ty, and operational responsibilities of SONYMA; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15852-01-6 S. 10314 2 1 (h) existing federal laws, regulations, secondary mortgage market 2 requirements, or federal housing finance policies that may affect imple- 3 mentation of such a program; 4 (i) any statutory, regulatory, or administrative changes necessary to 5 implement such a program; 6 (j) potential underwriting standards, occupancy requirements, loan 7 caps, reserve requirements, eligibility restrictions, or anti-specula- 8 tion safeguards necessary to ensure program sustainability; 9 (k) whether a limited pilot or demonstration program would be feasible 10 or beneficial and recommendations regarding the administration and over- 11 sight of such a program; 12 (l) existing mortgage mobility, mortgage portability, assumability, or 13 similar housing finance programs or models utilized in other states or 14 countries; 15 (m) the estimated number and categories of homeowners that may benefit 16 from such a program; and 17 (n) any other information the commissioner or SONYMA deems relevant. 18 § 3. Consultation. In conducting the study required pursuant to 19 section two of this act, the commissioner and SONYMA may consult with: 20 (a) the federal housing finance agency; 21 (b) the federal national mortgage association; 22 (c) the federal home loan mortgage corporation; 23 (d) the department of housing and urban development; 24 (e) mortgage lenders, servicers, housing finance experts, and munici- 25 pal bond experts; 26 (f) state and local housing agencies; 27 (g) housing advocacy organizations; 28 (h) academic institutions or policy organizations with expertise in 29 housing finance and mortgage markets; and 30 (i) any other public or private entities deemed necessary. 31 § 4. Report. No later than one year after the effective date of this 32 act, the commissioner of housing and community renewal and SONYMA shall 33 submit a report to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, 34 the minority leader, the speaker of the assembly, and the minority lead- 35 er of the assembly containing: 36 (a) the findings of the study; 37 (b) recommendations regarding the feasibility of establishing a hous- 38 ing mobility mortgage program; 39 (c) recommendations regarding statutory, regulatory, or administrative 40 actions necessary to implement such a program; 41 (d) an assessment of risks and benefits to taxpayers, homeowners, 42 housing markets, and state housing policy objectives; 43 (e) recommendations regarding whether a pilot or demonstration program 44 should be established; 45 (f) any recommended program safeguards or limitations necessary to 46 ensure fiscal sustainability and protect taxpayers; and 47 (g) any other recommendations deemed appropriate by the commissioner 48 or SONYMA. 49 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.